Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.160

Fraud in liquor warehouse receipts.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association or corporation to make, utter, circulate, sell or offer for sale any certificate of any warehouse, distillery or depository for intoxicating liquors unless the identical liquor mentioned in such certificate is in the possession of the warehouse, distillery or depository mentioned in such certificate fully paid for, so that the owners and holder of such certificate will be entitled to obtain such intoxicating liquors without the payment of any additional sum except the tax of the government and the tax of the state, county and city in which such warehouse, distillery or depository may be located, and any storage charges.

[ 1909 c 202 s 1. No RRS.]